Indiana, session 2026, SB20.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-3-2-30.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 30.5. (a) This section applies only to taxable years
beginning after December 31, 2026.
(b) For purposes of this section, "small business" means a
business entity that satisfies the following requirements during the
taxable year:
(1) The business entity employs less than fifty (50) employees
for each working day during each of twenty (20) or more
work weeks in the current or preceding calendar year.
(2) The majority of the employees of the business entity work
in Indiana.
(c) Each taxable year, an employer that:
(1) is a small business;
(2) participates in the voluntary family leave insurance
program established under IC 22-2-21.5-7; and
(3) pays some or all of an employee's contribution to the
2026 IN 20—LS 6114/DI 141


voluntary family leave insurance program trust fund under
IC 22-2-21.5-9(b)(1);
is entitled to a deduction from the employer's adjusted gross
income tax for the taxable year.
(d) The amount of the deduction is equal to:
(1) the total amount of the employer's contributions under
subsection (c) made to the voluntary family leave insurance
program trust fund established under IC 22-2-21.5-9 during
the taxable year; multiplied by
(2) two hundred percent (200%).
SECTION 2. IC 22-2-21.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 21.5. Voluntary Family Leave Insurance Program
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "Act" refers to the federal
Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993 (29 U.S.C. 2601 et seq.), as
in effect on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "department" refers to the
department of insurance created by IC 27-1-1-1.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "employee" means a person who
works directly for another person under an express or implied
contract of hire.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "employer" has the meaning set
forth in IC 6-3-1-5. The term includes the state and its political
subdivisions.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "program" refers to the
voluntary family leave insurance program established under
section 7 of this chapter.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "trust fund" refers to the
voluntary family leave insurance program trust fund established
by section 9 of this chapter.
Sec. 7. (a) Not later than January 1, 2027, the department shall
establish a voluntary family leave insurance program for the
purpose of providing family leave insurance benefits to employees
who elect to participate in the program.
(b) In developing the program described in subsection (a), the
department may request assistance from and coordinate with the
department of labor created by IC 22-1-1-1.
(c) The department shall administer the program.
(d) The department shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 necessary
to administer the program.
(e) The department may contract with an outside vendor to
2026 IN 20—LS 6114/DI 141


administer the program.
Sec. 8. The department shall do at least the following in
establishing the program under section 7 of this chapter:
(1) Establish the minimum criteria for voluntary participation
in the program by employees.
(2) Require each employee who elects to participate in the
program to contribute at a rate that is sufficient to fund the
program, including benefits paid and reasonable expenses
incurred. The department shall determine the rates at least
annually.
(3) Provide that an employer may pay some or all of the
employee's contribution.
(4) Require each participating employee to make the
employee's required contributions by payroll deduction.
(5) Establish employee benefit eligibility requirements that
include, at a minimum, the requirements that qualify an
employee for leave under the Act.
(6) Allow an employee the option to select both the benefit
amount and the number of weeks that the benefit will be paid
to the employee under the program. The department may
offer benefit levels of one hundred percent (100%),
seventy-five percent (75%), and fifty percent (50%) of an
employee's salary.
(7) Allow an employer that is exempt from the Act to
participate in the program.
Sec. 9. (a) The voluntary family leave insurance program trust
fund is established for the purpose of paying program benefits
under this chapter. Expenditures from the trust fund may be made
only to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The department
shall administer the trust fund.
(b) The trust fund consists of:
(1) money received by the department from employer or
employee contributions;
(2) appropriations from the general assembly; and
(3) money received from any other source.
(c) The expenses of administering the trust fund shall be paid
from money in the trust fund.
(d) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the trust
fund not currently needed to meet the obligations of the trust fund
in the same manner as other public money may be invested.
Interest that accrues from these investments shall be deposited at
least quarterly into the trust fund.
2026 IN 20—LS 6114/DI 141


(e) Money in the trust fund at the end of a state fiscal year does
not revert to the state general fund.
Sec. 10. Not later than November 1, 2026, the department shall
submit a report in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6 to the
legislative council and to the budget committee concerning the
department's proposed program, including any legislative changes
needed to implement the program.
2026 IN 20—LS 6114/DI 141